Illinois, session 104th, HB1452.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Eminent Domain Act is amended by changing 5Section 20-5-20 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 30/20-5-20)  (was 735 ILCS 5/7-106)7    Sec. 20-5-20. Withdrawal by persons having an interest. At 8any time after the plaintiff has taken possession of the 9property pursuant to the order of taking, if an appeal has not 10been and will not be taken from the court's order described in 11subsection (b) of Section 20-5-10 of this Act, or if such an 12appeal has been taken and has been determined in favor of the 13plaintiff, any party interested in the property may apply to 14the court for authority to withdraw, for his or her own use, 15his or her share (or any part thereof) of the amount 16preliminarily found by the court to be just compensation and 17deposited by the plaintiff, in accordance with the provisions 18of subsection (a) of Section 20-5-15 of this Act, as that share 19is determined by the court. The court shall then fix a date for 20a hearing on the application for authority to withdraw and 21shall require due notice of the application to be given to each 22party whose interests would be affected by the withdrawal. 23After the hearing, the court may authorize the withdrawal   HB1452- 2 -LRB104 07128 JRC 17165 b1requested, or any part thereof as is proper, but upon the 2condition that the party making the withdrawal shall refund to 3the clerk of the court, upon the entry of a proper court order, 4any portion of the amount withdrawn that exceeds the amount 5finally ascertained in the proceeding to be just compensation 6(or damages, costs, expenses, or attorney fees) owing to that 7party. At any time after the plaintiff has taken possession of 8the property, but no later than 2 years after the plaintiff has 9taken possession of the property, the court shall notify the 10interested parties of their right to apply for authority to 11withdraw any just compensation due to them. 12(Source: P.A. 94-1055, eff. 1-1-07.)